Wyoming, session 2025, SF0101.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 7-12-303(d) is amended to read:
7-12-303. New trial; motion for post-conviction
testing of DNA; motion contents; sufficiency of
allegations, consent to DNA sample; definitions.
(d) The court may not order DNA testing in cases in
which the trial or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
occurred after January 1, 2000 July 1, 2008 and the person
did not request DNA testing or present DNA evidence for
strategic or tactical reasons or as a result of a lack of
due diligence, unless the failure to exercise due diligence
is found to be a result of ineffective assistance of
counsel. A person convicted on or before January 1, 2000
July 1, 2008 shall not be required to make a showing of due
diligence under this subsection.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0101
ENROLLED ACT NO. 88, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2